src/morphology/compounding/compounding.lexc
LEXICON Main
[LEMMA=':    Compounding/Initial ;
[LEMMA=':    Compounding/Free    ;
[LEMMA=':    Compounding/None   ;
[COMPOUND_FORM=OMIT][LEMMA=':{-}   Compounding/Final   ;
[COMPOUND_FORM=OMIT][LEMMA=':{-}   Compounding/Free   ;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@[COMPOUND_FORM=OMIT][LEMMA=':@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@-	SUFFIX	; ! sole suffixes in broken compounds

LEXICON Compounding
	Compounding/Undashed	;
	Compounding/Dashed	;

LEXICON Compounding/Undashed
[BOUNDARY=COMPOUND][GUESS=COMPOUND]:{#}	Compounding/Middle		;
[BOUNDARY=COMPOUNDDASH][GUESS=COMPOUND]:{-}	Compounding/Middle		;

LEXICON Compounding/Dashed
[BOUNDARY=COMPOUNDDASH][GUESS=COMPOUND]:{-}	Compounding/Middle		;

LEXICON Compounding/Omission
[COMPOUND_FORM=OMIT]:-  Ennd    ;

LEXICON Compounding/Middle
[LEMMA=':    Compounding/Free    ;
[LEMMA=':    Compounding/Final   ;

LEXICON Compounding/Initial
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.NOMINAL@	Digits	;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.NOMINAL@	ACRONYM	;
@D.NEED@	PREFIX	;

LEXICON Compounding/None
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@	ABBREVIATION	;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@	PROPER	;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@	PRONOUN	;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@	ADPOSITION	;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@	ADVERB	;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@	CONJUNCTION	;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@	INTERJECTION	;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@	PARTICLE	;
@D.NEED@@P.NEED.REST@	PUNCTUATION	;

LEXICON Compounding/Free
@U.NEED.NOMINAL@@C.AGREE@@C.PLURALE@	Nominal	;
@U.NEED.NUMERAL@	NUMERAL	;
@C.AGREE@	VERB	; ! NB: nominalised verbs tell what they NEED in infl
@C.AGREE@	exceptions	; ! NB: exceptions tell what they NEED if anything

LEXICON Compounding/Final
@R.NEED.NOMINAL@@C.AGREE@@P.NEED.REST@	SUFFIX	;

LEXICON Prefix+Compounding
    Compounding/Undashed    ;
